District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0358.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “First Responder Retention Efforts Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 12(h)(2) of the Policemen and Firemen's Retirement and Disability Act,
approved September 1, 1916 (39 Stat 718; D.C Official Code § 5-712(b)), is amended to read as
follows:
“(b) Any member of the United States Secret Service Uniformed Division or of the
United States Park Police force or of the United States Secret Service Division, having reached
the age of 60 years, to whom this section apply shall, in the discretion of the head of the
member’s department, be retired from the service and shall be entitled to receive an annuity as
computed under paragraph (1) of this subsection.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.


ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47(a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).